Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5 Child Care Agencies
37-5-512. Abuse, neglect, or sexual abuse.

Notwithstanding § 71-3-503 or § 37-5-503, the department has the authority and responsibility to fully investigate, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, parts 1, 4 and 6 of this title, any allegation of abuse, neglect or sexual abuse that it receives regarding any child or children in the care of, or subject to the supervision, instruction or treatment of, any public or private entity or any person, whether or not such entity or person is subject to licensure or approval pursuant to this part or title 71, chapter 3, part 5, or title 49, chapter 1, part 11.

The departments of education and human services shall immediately report all allegations of abuse or neglect in any child care agency or child care program that they may license, approve, or certify to the department of children's services for investigation and shall cooperate with the department of children's services in any investigations of abuse or neglect involving any such agency or program. If the department of children's services receives a report of abuse or neglect in any child care program certified by the department of education or a child care agency licensed by the department of human services, it shall immediately notify the appropriate department of its investigation.

The departments of children's services, education and human services shall utilize any information obtained in the course of such investigations in the determination of whether appropriate care is being provided to children who may be in the care of any child care agency or child care program that the departments of children's services, education or human services license, approve or certify.

For purposes related to that determination and any appropriate licensing or approval action, the departments of education and human services shall be permitted access to the department of children's services' records; provided, that any information contained in any record of the departments of education or human services, or records relating to the investigation of the report of harm by the department of children's services shall be confidential and shall be released:

Only in the proceedings concerning any certification, licensing or approval action or injunctive action by the department of education or human services permitted by title 49, chapter 1, part 11, or title 71, chapter 3, part 5;

As otherwise permitted by the restrictions and conditions for the release of confidential records of the department of children's services pursuant to title 4 and chapter 1, part 4 or 6 of this title;

As otherwise permitted by the department of children's services' regulations concerning procedures for release of information of validated perpetrators of child abuse; or

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including any provisions related to expunction of records under title 40, the limited release of confidential records pursuant to this section shall not alter the confidential character of such records, which shall be maintained, as necessary, to protect children.

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(3), the rules of the department of children's services concerning release procedures for due process purposes shall apply to the release procedures of the departments of education and human services regarding perpetrators of child abuse validated by the department of children's services. Nothing herein shall be construed to permit the release of the name or identifying information of any person reporting child abuse or neglect under chapter 1, part 4 or 6 of this title.

In the conduct of such investigations involving the alleged abuse or neglect of any child or in the evaluation of the appropriateness of any child care program or child care agency or the appropriateness of the care provided by any person, the departments of children's services, education and human services shall be granted access to the records of children in the care of the person or entity and to all personnel files of the director and employees of the person or entity and to all records of the person or entity. They shall be allowed to inspect all the premises in which children are kept or cared for and shall be allowed to interview any and all children in the care of such person or entity if the departments of children's services, education or human services determine that it is necessary to do so.

If admission to the places, facilities or homes of the entities or persons involved in the care, supervision, instruction or treatment of the child is denied or delayed for any reason, the chancery, circuit or juvenile court of the county where the entity or person is located shall, upon cause shown by the department of children's services in investigations of abuse or neglect or sexual abuse involving any person or entity or in any of its licensing or approval activities, or upon cause shown by the departments of education or human services in any certification, licensing or approval activities, immediately, by ex parte order, direct the persons in charge of such places, facilities or any persons having responsibility for the care, supervision, instruction or treatment, of the child or children to allow entrance for the review of records, inspection of the premises, and to permit any interviews with or examinations of the children as permitted pursuant to chapter 1 of this title, title 49, chapter 1, part 11, or title 71, chapter 3, part 5.

If the departments of children's services, education or human services determine at any time that any person employed or associated in any manner with any person or entity, or any person providing care, supervision, instruction or treatment, of children has, at any time, abused, neglected or sexually abused a child, the department with certification, licensing or approval authority may take certificate or licensing action to prevent any child care program or child care agency certified, licensed or approved by it from continuing to provide care for children if such program or agency fails or refuses to take appropriate or timely action to prevent future abuse, neglect or sexual abuse by that person.

If the entity or person is subject to certification by the department of education pursuant to title 49, chapter 1, part 11, or is subject to licensure or approval by the department of human services pursuant to title 71, chapter 3, part 5, those departments may, in addition to any certificate, licensing or approval action, bring an action in the chancery, circuit or juvenile court of the county where the abuse, neglect or sexual abuse occurred or where the person resides to enjoin the entity found to have failed to protect the child or children from abuse, neglect or sexual abuse or the person who, at anytime, abused, neglected or sexually abused a child or children, from continuing currently, or in the future, to provide care, supervision, instruction or treatment for children on a full-time or part-time basis, or to enjoin the person who perpetrated the abuse or neglect from being associated in any manner with any entities or persons providing care, supervision, instruction or treatment for children.

If the department of children's services determines at any time that any person employed or associated in any manner with an entity or person, or any person individually, providing care, supervision, instruction or treatment of children, has at any time abused, neglected or sexually abused a child, the department may bring an action for injunctive relief as permitted by subdivision (c)(2), whether or not the entity or person is subject to certification, licensure or approval by the departments of children's services, education or human services.

In order to facilitate the protection of children, the departments of children's services, education and human services are specifically authorized to enter into inter-agency agreements for cooperative arrangements in any investigations or litigation authorized by this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 30.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

37-5-513. Inspection of persons or entities providing child care.

It is the duty of the department, through its duly authorized agents, to inspect at regular intervals, without previous notice, all child care agencies or suspected child care agencies, as defined in § 37-5-501.

The department is given the right of entrance, privilege of inspection, access to accounts, records, and information regarding the whereabouts of children under care for the purpose of determining the kind and quality of the care provided to the children and to obtain a proper basis for its decisions and recommendations.

If refused entrance for inspection of a licensed, approved or suspected child care agency, the chancery or circuit court of the county where the licensed, approved or suspected child care agency may be located may issue an immediate ex parte order permitting the department's inspection upon a showing of probable cause, and the court may direct any law enforcement officer to aid the department in executing such order and inspection. Refusal by the child care agency to obey the inspection order may be punished as contempt.

Any violation of the rights given in this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 31.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

37-5-514. Violations of licensing regulations — Probation, suspension, denial and revocation of licenses — Appeal procedures.

If any complaint is made to the department concerning any alleged violation of the laws or regulations governing a child care agency, the department shall investigate such complaint and shall take such action as it deems necessary to protect the children in the care of such agency.

If, during the licensing period, the department determines that a child care agency is not in compliance with the laws or regulations governing its operation, and if, after reasonable written notice to the agency of the violation, the department determines that the violation remains uncorrected, the department may place the licensed agency on probation for a definite period of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, as determined by the department, and the department shall require the posting by the agency of the notice of probation. The department shall provide the agency a written basis describing the violation of the licensing rules that supports the basis for the probationary status.

If placed on probation, the agency shall immediately post a copy of the probation notice, together with a list provided by the department of the violations that were the basis for the probation, in a conspicuous place as directed by the department and with the agency's license, and the agency shall immediately notify, in writing, the custodians of each of the children in its care of the agency's status, the basis for the probation and of the agency's right to an informal review of the probationary status.

If the agency requests an informal review within two (2) business days of the imposition of probation, either verbally or in writing to the department's licensing staff that imposed the probation, the department shall informally review the probationary status by a department licensing staff person or other designee who was not involved in the decision to impose the probation. The agency may submit any written or oral statements as argument to such staff person or designee within five (5) business days of the imposition of the probation. Written and oral statements may be received by any available electronic means. The licensing staff person or designee shall render a decision, in writing, upholding, modifying or lifting the probationary status within seven (7) business days of the imposition of the probation.

If the licensing staff person or designee did not lift the probation under subdivision (b)(2)(B), the agency may also appeal such action in writing to the commissioner within five (5) business days of the receipt of the notice of the licensing staff person, or designee's decision regarding the agency's probationary status as determined in subdivision (b)(2)(B). If timely appealed, the department shall conduct an administrative hearing pursuant to the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, concerning the department's action within fifteen (15) business days of receipt of the appeal, and shall render a decision, in writing, within seven (7) business days following conclusion of the hearing. The hearing officer may uphold, modify or lift the probation.

This subsection (b) shall be discretionary with the department, and shall not be a prerequisite to any licensing action to suspend, deny or revoke a license of a child care agency.

If the department determines that any applicant for a temporary license or for the renewal of an existing license has failed to attain, or an existing licensee has failed to maintain, compliance with licensing laws or regulations after reasonable notice of such failure and a reasonable opportunity to demonstrate compliance with licensing laws or regulations, the department may deny the application for the new or renewed license or may revoke the existing license; provided, that the department at any time may deny a temporary license if the applicant fails to meet the initial requirements for its issuance; and, provided, further, if the department determines that repeated or serious violations of licensing laws or regulations warrant the denial or revocation of the license, then, notwithstanding any provisions of § 4-5-320 or this subsection (c) to the contrary, the department may seek denial or revocation of the license regardless of the licensee's demonstration of compliance either before or after the notice of denial of the application or after notice of the revocation.

Notwithstanding § 4-5-320, the notice of denial or revocation may be served personally by an authorized representative of the department who shall verify service of the notice by affidavit, or the notice may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested.

If application for the temporary or annual license is denied or if an existing license is revoked, the applicant may appeal the denial or revocation by requesting, in writing, to the department a hearing before the child care agency board of review within ten (10) days of the personal delivery or mailing date of the notice of denial or revocation. Failure to timely appeal shall result in the expiration of any existing license immediately upon the expiration of the time for appeal.

The hearing upon the denial or revocation shall be heard by the board of review within thirty (30) days of the date of service of the notice of denial or revocation; provided, that, for good cause as stated in an order entered on the record, the board or the administrative law judge or hearing officer may continue the hearing. In order to protect the children in the care of the agency from any risk to their health, safety and welfare, the board or administrative law judge or hearing officer shall re-set the hearing at the earliest date that circumstances permit.

If timely appeal is made, pending the hearing upon the denial or revocation, the child care agency may continue to operate pending the decision of the board of review unless the license is summarily suspended as provided in subsection (d).

The board, as part of its decision regarding the status of the applicant's application for a license or the licensee's license, may direct that the child care agency be allowed to operate on a probationary or conditional status, or may grant or continue the license with any restrictions or conditions on the agency's authority to provide care.

Subject to the following provisions of this subsection (d), if the department determines at any time that the health, safety or welfare of the children in care of the child care agency imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of the license may be ordered by the department pending any further proceedings for revocation, denial or other action. If the department determines that revocation or denial of the license is warranted following suspension, those proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined as authorized by this part.

The department shall set forth with specificity in its order the legal and factual basis for its decision stating therein the specific laws or regulations that were violated by the agency, and shall state with specificity in the order the reasons that the issuance of the order of summary suspension is necessary to adequately protect the health, safety or welfare of children in the care of the child care agency. Summary suspension may be ordered in circumstances that have resulted in death, injury or harm to a child or that have posed or threatened to pose a serious and immediate threat of harm or injury to a child based upon the intentional or negligent failure to comply with licensing laws or regulations.

In issuing an order of summary suspension of a license, the department shall use, at a minimum, the following procedures:

The department shall proceed with the summary suspension of the agency's license and shall notify the licensee of the opportunity for an informal hearing within three (3) business days of the issuance of the order of summary suspension before an administrative law judge or before a hearing officer who is not an employee of the department.

The notice provided to the licensee may be provided by any reasonable means and, consistent with the provisions of subdivision (d)(2), shall inform the licensee of the reasons for the action or intended action by the department and of the opportunity for an informal hearing as permitted by subdivision (d)(3)(C).

The informal hearing described by this subdivision (d)(3) shall not be required to be held under the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. The hearing is intended to provide an informal, reasonable opportunity for the licensee to present to the hearing official the licensee's version of the circumstances leading to the suspension order. The sole issues to be considered are whether the public health, safety or welfare imperatively required emergency action by the department and what, if any, corrective measures have been taken by the child care agency following the violation of licensing laws or regulations and prior to the issuance of the order of summary suspension that eliminate the danger to the health, safety or welfare of the children in the care of the agency. The hearing official may lift, modify or continue the order of summary suspension.

Subsequent to the hearing on the summary suspension, the department may proceed with revocation or denial of the license or other action as authorized by this part, regardless of the decision concerning summary suspension of the license.

The department shall by rule establish any further necessary criteria that it determines are required for the determination of circumstances that warrant imposition of the summary suspension order and any other necessary procedures for implementation of the summary suspension process.

If the conditions existing in the child care agency present an immediate threat to the health, safety or welfare of the children in care, the department may also seek a temporary restraining order from the chancery or circuit court of the county in which the child care agency is located seeking immediate closure of the agency to prevent further harm or threat of harm to the children in care, or immediate restraint against any violations of the licensing laws or regulations that are harming or that threaten harm to the children in care. The department may seek any further injunctive relief as permitted by law in order to protect children from the violations, or threatened violations, of the licensing laws or regulations. The use of injunctive relief as provided by this subdivision (d)(5) may be used as an alternative, or supplementary measure, to the issuance of an order of summary suspension or any other administrative proceeding.

In determining whether to deny, revoke or summarily suspend a license, the department may choose to deny, revoke or suspend only certain authority of the licensee to operate, and may permit the licensee to continue operation, but may restrict or modify the licensee's authority to provide certain services or perform certain functions, including, but not limited to: transportation or food service, enrollment of children at the agency, the agency's hours of operation, the agency's use of certain parts of the agency's physical facilities or any other function of the child care agency that the department determines should be restricted or modified to protect the health, safety or welfare of the children. The board of review, in considering the actions to be taken regarding the license, may likewise restrict a license or place whatever conditions on the license and the licensee it deems appropriate for the protection of children in the care of the agency.

The actions by the department or the board authorized by this subsection (e) may be appealed as otherwise provided in this part for any denial, revocation or suspension.

When an application for a license has been denied, or a license has been revoked, on one (1) occasion, the child care agency may not reapply for a license for a period of one (1) year from the effective date of the denial or revocation order if not appealed or, if appealed, from the effective date of the board's or reviewing court's order.

If application for a license has been denied, or a license has been revoked, on two (2) occasions, the child care agency may not reapply for a license for a period of two (2) years from the effective date of the denial or revocation if not appealed or, if appealed, from the effective date of the board's or reviewing court's order.

If an application for a license has been denied, or a license has been revoked on three (3) occasions, the agency shall not receive another license for the care of children.

No person who served as full or part owner or as director or as a member of the management of a child care agency shall receive a license to operate a child care agency if that person participated in such capacity in a child care agency that has been denied a license, or that had a license revoked, on three (3) occasions.

The time restrictions of subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) may be waived by the board of review in the hearing in which the denial or revocation is sustained, or, if requested by the former licensee in writing to the commissioner, in a separate subsequent hearing before the board of review or, in the discretion of the commissioner, upon review by the commissioner.

The agency must show to the board's or the commissioner's satisfaction that the agency has corrected the deficiencies that led to the denial or revocation, and that the child care agency can demonstrate that it has the present and future ability, and is willing, to maintain compliance with licensing laws or regulations. The decision of the board or the commissioner shall be reduced to an order, which shall be a final order pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, and may be appealed pursuant to § 4-5-322.

No waiver may be granted for any permanent restriction that has been imposed pursuant to subdivision (f)(3).

In conducting hearings before the board of review on the appeal of a denial or revocation of a license or for review of summary suspension orders, it is the legislative intent that such hearings be promptly determined consistent with the safety of the children in the care of the child care agency appealing the department's licensing action and with the due process rights of the license applicants or licensees.

If, however, the administrative procedures division of the office of the secretary of state certifies by letter to the recording secretary of the board of review that the division's contested case docket prevents the scheduling of a hearing on the appeal of a denial or revocation of a license before the board of review within the initial time frames set forth in this part, then the department shall have authority to appoint a hearing officer from the department to conduct the proceedings before the board. The substitute hearing officer shall have all authority as an administrative law judge of the department of state. The hearing may be continued by order of the board for the purpose of obtaining a substitute hearing officer.

Hearings on summary suspension orders shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the administrative procedures division of the secretary of state's office. The administrative law judge shall have authority, as otherwise permitted in this section, to enter orders binding on the department resulting from show cause hearings involving summary suspension orders. If the administrative procedures division informs the department that the division's contested case docket prevents the scheduling of a hearing on the issuance of a summary suspension order within the initial time frames set forth in this part, the department may utilize a hearing officer from the department to conduct the show cause hearing.

By July 1, 2000, any initial rules to implement this section shall be by emergency rules of the department; provided, that any permanent rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 32; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

37-5-515. Board of review for licensing actions.

Actions by the department to deny or revoke or to otherwise limit any license, except for the summary suspension of a license, shall be reviewed by the child care agency board of review established pursuant to title 71, chapter 3, part 5.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 33.

37-5-516. Licensing standards committees.

The commissioner shall appoint a standards committee composed of twelve (12) citizens, three (3) from each grand division of the state, and three (3) at-large for the purpose of developing or reviewing standards and regulations for each class of child care agency defined in this part. The classes of child care agencies regulated by the department shall be represented by members of the standards committee.

For any new class of child care agency as defined in this part, the standards committee shall develop and recommend to the commissioner the standards and regulations for that new class of child care agency. The standards and regulations of each existing class of child care agency shall be reviewed by a standards committee beginning every four (4) years following the date of submission of its last recommendations or more frequently as the commissioner may direct.

The standards committee shall act in an advisory capacity to the commissioner in recommending any initial standards or regulations or any changes to the existing standards or regulations of any class of child care agency.

The committee shall cease to exist upon submitting its recommendations to the commissioner, but may be re-established by the commissioner at any time to further review its recommendations or to consider additional standards or regulations or to consider revisions to the standards or regulations.

In making appointments to the committee, the commissioner shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the committee is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the committee is a member of a racial minority.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, in making appointments to the standards committee, the department shall strive to ensure that the membership of the standards committee includes a balance of representatives of the regulated industry and persons whose expertise would be of assistance to the department. The department shall appoint child advocates, social workers, attorneys, and other persons with knowledge and expertise in the specified area, as well as citizen members to the committee.

The members of the committee shall not receive any compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their travel to and from the committee meetings and for their meals and lodging in accordance with the state travel procedures and regulations.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 34; 2007, ch. 453, § 3; 2011, ch. 281, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The Standards committee, department of children's services, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

37-5-517. Individual plans — Reports.

An agency shall prepare a written plan for each child in foster care and each child placed in its care by voluntary agreement. Such plans shall be prepared at the time a child comes under the supervision of the agency. Such plan shall be subject to review by the department. Failure to prepare such a plan shall be grounds for revocation of the agency's license.

In its annual report to the department pursuant to § 37-5-519, the agency shall include the number of children in foster care, the total number of children who have been in care during the year, the number of plans prepared, the number of children adopted, and the average length of the stay of the children.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 35.

37-5-518. Annual reports of child care agencies.

Each child care agency shall make an annual report of its work to the department in such reasonable form as the department shall prescribe.

The department shall prepare and supply to all child care agencies the necessary printed forms to record the requested information.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 36.

37-5-519. Departmental annual report.

The department shall prepare a comprehensive annual report of the status of child care agencies within the state subject to its jurisdiction, accompanied by special comments and recommendations, and the reports shall be published at state expense for the information of the general assembly and for distribution to interested persons. The report shall be published as part of the department's annual report required by §37-5-105(4).

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 37; 2015, ch. 178, § 4.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “the” for “such” in the middle of the first sentence and added the second sentence to the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 178, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to legislators of publication of report, §3-1-114.